New Jersey, session 222, S1445.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall establish and maintain an online payment processing system for the payment of any fees or fines allocated under the States electronic toll collection system.  In addition to any other design features that the authority deems appropriate, the online payment processing system shall be designed to increase the ease of use, increase accessibility for all users, minimize network errors, and include a live chat function to assist users with any issues that may arise while using the system.  The authority shall maintain and upgrade the system on a regular basis. b.    (1)  When the authority operates its electronic toll collection system as part of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group or any other successor entity, the lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group shall ensure that the payment processing system maintained by the New Jersey E-ZPass Group or contracted vendor, as applicable, complies with the requirements set forth in subsection a. of this section.  If the payment processing system is maintained by a contracted vendor, the lead agency shall conduct an annual performance audit of the system. (2)   As used in this subsection, lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group or lead agency means an agency, authority, or political subdivision of this State which has the authority to enter into, manage, or negotiate contracts to provide service to accounts with a New Jersey electronic toll collection system subject to sections 6 through 10 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:23-34.1 through C.27:23-34.5) or sections 11 through 15 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:25A-21.1 through C.27:25A-21.5). 2.  a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall establish and maintain an online payment processing system for the payment of any fees or fines allocated under the States electronic toll collection system.  In addition to any other design features that the authority deems appropriate, the online payment processing system shall be designed to increase the ease of use, increase accessibility for all users, minimize network errors, and include a live chat function to assist users with any issues that may arise while using the system.  The authority shall maintain and upgrade the system on a regular basis. b.    (1)  When the authority operates its electronic toll collection system as part of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group or any other successor entity, the lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group shall ensure that the payment processing system maintained by the New Jersey E-ZPass Group or contracted vendor, as applicable, complies with the requirements set forth in subsection a. of this section.  If the payment processing system is maintained by a contracted vendor, the lead agency shall conduct an annual performance audit of the system. (2)   As used in this subsection, lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group or lead agency means an agency, authority, or political subdivision of this State which has the authority to enter into, manage, or negotiate contracts to provide service to accounts with a New Jersey electronic toll collection system subject to sections 6 through 10 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:23-34.1 through C.27:23-34.5) or sections 11 through 15 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:25A-21.1 through C.27:25A-21.5). 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.